test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_31si_kasi_gt-norm-dial_Var.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct.


  Noun - käsi - ok : # Noun 'hånd' - ei tsekattu
     käsi+N+Sg+Nom: käsi
     käsi+N+Sg+Gen: [käen, käjen]
     käsi+N+Sg+Par: kättä
     käsi+N+Sg+Tra: [käeksi, käjeksi]
     käsi+N+Sg+Abe: [käettä, käjettä]
     käsi+N+Sg+Ine: [käessä, käjessä]
     käsi+N+Sg+Ela: [käestä, käjestä]
     käsi+N+Sg+Ill: kätheen
     käsi+N+Sg+Ade: [käelä, käjelä]
     käsi+N+Sg+Abl: [käeltä, käjeltä]
     käsi+N+Sg+All: [käele, käjele]
     käsi+N+Sg+Ess: kätenä
     käsi+N+Pl+Nom: [käet, käjet]
     käsi+N+Pl+Gen: käsitten
     käsi+N+Pl+Par: käsiä
     käsi+N+Pl+Tra: käsiksi
     käsi+N+Pl+Abe: käsittä
     käsi+N+Pl+Ine: käsissä
     käsi+N+Pl+Ela: käsistä
     käsi+N+Pl+Ill: käshiin
     käsi+N+Pl+Ade: käsilä
     käsi+N+Pl+Abl: käsiltä
     käsi+N+Pl+All: käsile
     käsi+N+Pl+Ess: käsinä
     käsi+N+Pl+Com: käsine
